Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.414

Locally determined compensation plans for certificated instructional staff—Model salary grid—Stakeholder technical working group.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction must convene and facilitate a stakeholder technical working group to develop a model salary grid for school district use in developing locally determined compensation plans for certificated instructional staff.

(2) The grid is intended to be used as a resource by school districts in determining local salaries in the collective bargaining process, and it is intended to provide guidance to districts in hiring staff based on the allocation methodology, regionalization adjustments, and compensation restrictions in chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. However, districts are not required to use this grid in bargaining or determining actual salaries.

(3) Membership of the technical working group convened by the superintendent of public instruction may include, but is not limited to, one school district administrator each from an urban and a rural district east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and from an urban and a rural district west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, a representative of an organization representing school district certificated instructional staff, and a representative of an educational service district.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must provide the initial model grid to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature for their review by December 1, 2017. The superintendent of public instruction must post the model grid on the website for the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction may reconvene the technical working group to update the model grid based on future legislative changes to methodologies for allocating and regionalizing salaries for certificated instructional staff.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 107.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.